Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-822
Person, defined.

The words person or persons, as used in sections 59-801 to 59-831, shall be deemed to include all corporations, associations, limited liability companies, combinations, or concerns whatsoever.

Laws 1905, c. 162, § 19, p. 644;

R.S.1913, § 4063;

C.S.1922, § 3466;

C.S.1929, § 59-819;

R.S.1943, § 59-822;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 374;

Laws 2002, LB 1278, § 12.

The word person includes a corporation. O. G. Pierce Co. v. Century Indemnity Co., 136 Neb. 78, 285 N.W. 91 (1939).